South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3949.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Official choral anthem SECTION 1.    Article 9, Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-1-614.    "Dum Spiro Spero" translated as "While I Breathe, I Hope" is the official choral anthem of the State. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________